Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2541
Bond issuance; consent not required.

Bonds may be issued under the Joint Public Agency Act without obtaining the consent of any department, division, commission, board, bureau, or instrumentality of this state and without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those proceedings, conditions, or things which are specifically required therefor by the act, and the validity of and security for any bonds shall not be affected by the existence or nonexistence of any such consent or other proceedings, conditions, or things.

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 41.